Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-3202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Door to College Scholarship Act:

(1) Award means a grant of money under the act by the commission in the form of a Door to College Scholarship to an eligible student for educational expenses;

(2) Award year means the period beginning on July 1 through the following June 30;

(3) Commission means the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education;

(4) Educational expenses means student costs for tuition, mandatory fees, other education-related fees, room and board, books, and other costs related to a student's education;

(5) Eligible postsecondary educational institution means a public or private postsecondary educational institution:

(a) Located in Nebraska;

(b) Primarily engaged in the instruction of students;

(c) Satisfying state statutory requirements relating to the approval and licensure of schools, colleges, and universities and maintaining accreditation by an accrediting organization recognized by the United States Department of Education;

(d) Offering courses of instruction in regularly scheduled classes to regularly enrolled undergraduate students who reside in Nebraska and have received a high school diploma or the equivalent; and

(e) Which has adopted, and has available for inspection, award refund and repayment policies;

(6) Eligible student means an undergraduate student who:

(a) Graduated from high school from an accredited education program at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center operated and utilized in compliance with state law, or graduated from an approved or accredited public, private, denominational, or parochial school or received a diploma of high school equivalency issued by the Commissioner of Education after being discharged from a youth rehabilitation and treatment center operated and utilized in compliance with state law;

(b) Is enrolled in an eligible postsecondary educational institution;

(c) Has applied for federal financial aid through the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the applicable award year;

(d) Is a resident student who is domiciled in Nebraska as provided by section 85-502; and

(e) Complies with all other provisions of the Door to College Scholarship Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;

(7) Full-time status means enrollment in at least twenty-four semester credit hours, thirty-six quarter credit hours, or nine hundred clock hours per award year;

(8) Part-time status means enrollment in at least twelve semester credit hours, eighteen quarter credit hours, or four hundred fifty clock hours per award year; and

(9) Undergraduate student means an individual who has not earned a first baccalaureate or professional degree and is enrolled in a postsecondary educational program which leads to, or is creditable toward, a first baccalaureate degree, associate degree, certificate, diploma, or the equivalent.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 29;

Laws 2024, LB1270, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB306, § 10.